Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2506
Legislative power; limitation.

The Legislature may amend or repeal the Joint Public Agency Act or any law governing public agencies, and any agreement which creates a joint public agency is subject to the amendment or repeal of a law governing participating public agencies by subsequent acts of the Legislature, the United States, or another state, except that no act of the Legislature may impair any contractual obligation of a joint public agency or any participant thereof, including a contract for bonded indebtedness.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 6.